Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0761.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 32723. (1) Except as provided in subsection (13), all of the following persons shall obtain a water withdrawal permit prior to before making the a water withdrawal: (a) A person who that proposes to develop withdrawal capacity to make a new withdrawal of more than 2,000,000 gallons of water per day from the waters of the state to supply a common distribution system. (b) A person who that proposes to develop increased withdrawal capacity beyond baseline capacity of more than 2,000,000 gallons of water per day from the waters of the state to supply a common distribution system. (c) A person who that proposes to develop withdrawal capacity to make a new or increased large quantity withdrawal of more than 1,000,000 gallons of water per day from the waters of the state to supply a common distribution system that a site-specific review has determined is a zone C withdrawal. (d) A person who that proposes to develop a new or increased withdrawal capacity that will result in an intrabasin transfer of more than 100,000 gallons per day average over any 90-day period. (2) A person shall apply for a water withdrawal permit under this section by submitting an application to the department containing that contains the information described in section 32706c(1)(a) to (e) 32706c(4) and an evaluation of existing hydrological and hydrogeological conditions. If the applicant proposes to undertake a preventative measure along with the withdrawal, the property owner applicant shall provide the department with a detailed description of the preventative measure and relevant information as to how the preventative measure will be implemented. In addition, the applicant shall submit an application fee in the amount of $2,000.00. The department shall transmit application fees collected under this section to the state treasurer to be credited to the water use protection fund created in section 32714. (3) An application submitted under subsection (2) is considered to be administratively complete effective 30 days after it the application is received by the department unless the department notifies the applicant, in writing, during this 30-day period that the application is not administratively complete or that the application fee required to be accompanied with the application under subsection (2) has not been paid. If the department determines that the application is not administratively complete, the notification shall must specify the information necessary to make the application administratively complete. If the department notifies the applicant as provided in this subsection, the 30-day period is tolled until the applicant submits to the department the specified information or application fee. (4) The department shall provide public notification of its receipt of applications under this section and shall provide a public comment period of not less than 45 days before applications are acted upon on under subsection (5). (5) The department shall make a decision whether to grant or deny a water withdrawal permit under this section within not later than 120 days of after receipt of an administratively complete application. (6) The department shall issue a water withdrawal permit under subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) if all of the following conditions are met: (a) All water withdrawn, less any consumptive use, is returned, either naturally or after use, to the source watershed. (b) The withdrawal will be implemented so as to ensure that the proposal will result in no individual or cumulative adverse resource impacts. Cumulative The department shall evaluate cumulative adverse resource impacts under this subdivision shall be evaluated by the department based upon on available information gathered by the department. (c) Subject to section 32726, the withdrawal will be implemented so as to ensure that it the withdrawal is in compliance with all applicable local, state, and federal laws as well as all legally binding regional interstate and international agreements, including the boundary waters treaty of 1909. (d) The proposed use is reasonable under common law principles of water law in Michigan.this state. (e) For permit applications received on or after January 1, 2009, the The applicant has self-certified self-certifies that he or she the applicant is in compliance with environmentally sound and economically feasible water conservation measures developed by the applicable water user's sector under section 32708a or has self-certified self-certifies that he or she the applicant is in compliance with environmentally sound and economically feasible water conservation measures developed for the water use associated with that specific withdrawal. (f) The department determines that the proposed withdrawal will not violate public or private rights and limitations imposed by Michigan water law laws or other Michigan common law duties applicable in this state. (g) The withdrawal does not exceed 2,000,000 gallons per day for consumptive use, as that term is defined in section 34201. (7) The department shall issue a water withdrawal permit under subsection (1)(d) if the transfer complies with section 4.9 of the compact. (8) In reviewing a proposed preventative measure, the department shall consider the effect of the preventative measure on preventing an adverse resource impact by diminishing the effect of the withdrawal on stream or river flow or the temperature regime of the stream or river. If the department approves a preventative measure in conjunction with a water withdrawal permit under this section, the department shall enter into a legally enforceable implementation schedule for completion of the preventative measure. (9) A proposed use for which a water withdrawal permit is issued under this section shall must be considered to satisfy the requirements of section 4.11 of the compact. (10) A permit issued under part 31 pursuant to in accordance with 33 USC 1326(b) shall be is considered sufficient to demonstrate that there will not be an adverse resource impact under section 32721 and satisfies the conditions for a water withdrawal permit under this section. Upon On receipt of an application under this section and evidence that the applicant holds a part 31 permit described in this subsection, the department shall grant the applicant a water withdrawal permit under this subsection. (11) The department may revoke a water withdrawal permit issued under this section if the department determines following a hearing, based upon on clear and convincing scientific evidence, that the withdrawal is causing an adverse resource impact. (12) A person who that is aggrieved by a determination of the department under this section related to a water withdrawal permit may file a sworn petition with the department setting forth the grounds and reasons for the complaint and asking for a contested case hearing on the matter pursuant to in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. A petition filed more than 60 days after action on the water withdrawal permit may be rejected by the department as being untimely. The department shall issue a final decision on a petition for a contested case hearing within not later than 6 months after receiving the petition. A determination, action, or inaction by the department following a contested case hearing is subject to judicial review as provided in the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (13) The following withdrawals are not required to obtain a water withdrawal permit under this section: (a) A withdrawal by a community supply that holds a permit under the safe drinking water act, 1976 PA 399, MCL 325.1001 to 325.1023. (b) Seasonal withdrawals of not more than 2,000,000 gallons of water per day average in any consecutive 90-day period to supply a common distribution system unless the withdrawals result in a diversion. (c) A withdrawal for the production of bottled drinking water approved by the department under a water source review conducted under in accordance with section 17 of the safe drinking water act, 1976 PA 399, MCL 325.1017. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a)    Senate Bill No. 763 (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01932'25) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H01932'25).